apertium-cy-en/apertium-cy-en.cy.dix.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
<!-- The lowercase letters of the Welsh alphabet followed by letters with accents, followed by letters found in loan words -->
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHILMNOPRSTUWYÂÊÎÔŴŶKVXZabcdefghilmnoprstuwyâêîôŵŷáïjkvxz</alphabet>
  <!-- Symbol definitions -->
  <xi:include xmlns:xi="http://www.w3.org/2001/XInclude" href="apertium-cy-en.symbols.xml"/>
  <!-- Paradigm definitions -->
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>,</l>
          <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r>'<s n="apos"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separ">
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Personal pronouns -->
    <pardef n="prsubj__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ef</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fe</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fo</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chwi</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hwy</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nhw</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/ar__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnaf</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnaf<b/>fi</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arna<b/>i</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnat</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnat<b/>ti</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arno</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arno<b/>ef</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arno<b/>fe</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arno<b/>fo</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arni</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arni<b/>hi</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnom</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnom<b/>ni</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnon<b/>ni</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnoch</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnoch<b/>chi</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnynt</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnynt<b/>hwy</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arnyn<b/>nhw</l>
          <r>ar<s n="pr"/><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pronoms personals de subjecte"><i/><par n="prsubj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ar"><i/><par n="/ar__pr"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="separa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="coma"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="cometa"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="paresq"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="pardret"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="separ"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="guionet"/>
    </e>
